Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396.5b, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 396.5b. A. Beginning July 1, 2006, as a condition of
renewal or reactivation of a license, each licensee shall submit to
the Oklahoma Funeral Board evidence of the completion of clock hours
of continuing education courses approved by the Board within the
twelve (12) months immediately preceding the term for which the
license is issued. The number of hours, or its equivalent, required
for each licensed term shall be determined by the Board and
promulgated by rule. Each licensee shall be required to complete
and include as part of the continuing education provision a certain
number of required subjects as provided by rule.
B. The continuing education courses required by this section
shall be satisfied by courses approved by the Board, the Oklahoma
Funeral Directors Association, or the Academy of Professional
Funeral Service Practice.

C. The Board shall maintain a listing of courses approved by
the Board.
D. The Board shall not issue an active renewal license or
reactivate a license unless the continuing education requirement set
forth in this section is satisfied within the prescribed time
period.
E. The provisions of this section shall not apply:
1. During the period a licensee is on inactive status;
2. To a nonresident licensee licensed in this state if the
licensee is not engaged in funeral service or embalming practice in
Oklahoma; and
3. To classes of licensees exempted by rules of the Board.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3260 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3260 Page 3